District of Columbia statutes.
32-753

Eligibility for grants.

The following individuals and groups shall be eligible to receive grants or other assistance from the Job Opportunity Bank:

(1)

Low-income District residents;

(2)

Job skills-deficient residents;

(3)

District businesses, business coalitions, or nonprofit organizations partnered with District businesses or business coalitions seeking to hire low-income District residents or job skills-deficient residents and develop a workforce from those individuals; or

(4)

District businesses, business coalitions, or nonprofit organizations partnered with District businesses or business coalitions seeking to upgrade the skills of their current workforce, composed of at least 51% District residents, in order to maintain the employment of the current workforce.

History

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 204, 53 DCR 2602